Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-570
Interference with person hunting, trapping, or fishing; violation; penalty; use of aircraft, vessel, or vehicle; destruction of property; liability.

Any person violating section 37-564 shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. In addition, any person who damages crops, fields, livestock, fences, gates, timber, water, or any other property by the use of any aircraft, vessel, vehicle, snowmobile, or other conveyance shall be liable to the property owner.

Laws 1978, LB 828, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-534;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 290.